src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-toollad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - toollâđ: # MLchecked

    toollâđ+V+Inf: toollâđ
    toollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolluum
    toollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálloo
    toollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tuállojeen
    toollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuállojeh
    toollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tolluu
    toollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tuállojim
    toollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tollui
    toollâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuállojii
    toollâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolâstâm
    toollâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toolâst
    toollâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tolâsteen
    toollâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tolâsteh
    toollâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toolâst
    toollâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tolâstim
    toollâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tolâstij
    toollâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tolâstii
    toollâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolâdâm
    toollâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toolâd
    toollâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tolâdeen
    toollâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tolâdeh
    toollâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toolâd
    toollâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tolâdim
    toollâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tolâdij
    toollâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tolâdii
    toollâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolâttâm
    toollâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toolât
    toollâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tolâtteen
    toollâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tolâtteh
    toollâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toolât
    toollâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tolâttim
    toollâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tolâttij
    toollâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tolâttii
    toollâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolâškuáđám
    toollâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tolâškuát
    toollâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tolâškyetteen
    toollâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tolâškyeteh, tolâškyetih]
    toollâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tolâškyeđe
    toollâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tolâškuottim
    toollâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tolâškuođij
    toollâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tolâškuottii
    toollâđ+V+Der/mas+N+Sg+Nom: [tolâmuš, tolâmâš]
    toollâđ+V+Der/mas+N+Sg+Ill: [tolâmušân, tolâmâšân]
    toollâđ+V+Der/mas+N+Sg+Loc: [tolâmušâst, tolâmâšâst]
